Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-1139
Special education programs and services; children eligible.

Each school district shall include only students identified and verified pursuant to sections 79-1137 and 79-1138 in special education programs and shall not provide special education services pursuant to the Special Education Act to any child who has not been so identified and verified.

Laws 1986, LB 942, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1986, § 43-605.02;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 18;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3318;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 821;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 31.